Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-896
Interstate bridges; funds; how derived; acquisition of property.

(1) The funds necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 shall be derived from the revenue provided to the department by law, from funds of the United States accepted by the department for use pursuant to the provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122, and from gifts or donations made to the department for use pursuant to sections 39-891 to 39-8,122.

(2) The department shall have the power and authority to accept any funds from the United States which are available to the department for use pursuant to the provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122, and the department may enter into such agreements or contracts with the United States as shall be necessary for the acceptance of such funds; Provided, that any such agreement or contract shall not be contrary to the laws of this state.

(3) The department is hereby authorized to acquire, by gift, either temporarily or permanently, lands, real or personal property or any interests therein, or any easements deemed to be necessary or desirable for present or future interstate bridge purposes.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 6, p. 636.